Vermont, session 2025-2026, H158.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 2295a is added to read:
§ 2295a. AUTHORITY OF MUNICIPAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENTS
TO REGULATE HYGIENIC FACE MASKS
Except as otherwise provided by law, no municipal corporation, by
ordinance, resolution, rule, or other enactment, shall directly limit or prohibit
the use of hygienic face masks.
VT LEG #380306 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.158
2025 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. MUNICIPAL CHARTERS; PROVISIONS SUPERSEDED
The provisions of this act shall supersede any inconsistent provisions of a
municipal charter.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380306 v.1